Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-5649
Legislative appropriation.

The Legislature shall appropriate sufficient funds to the Department of Health and Human Services to enable the Office of Rural Health to carry out its duties pursuant to section 71-5647.

Laws 1990, LB 994, § 4;

Laws 1991, LB 400, § 24;

Laws 1996, LB 1044, § 726;

Laws 1998, LB 1073, § 152;

Laws 2005, LB 301, § 53;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 624.